Maine, session 132, LD470.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §13012-A, sub-§4, as amended by PL 2019, c. 518, §1, is
further amended to read:
4. Requirements. A school administrative unit may not employ a conditionally
certified teacher or educational specialist unless it has a locally designed preapproved or
approved locally developed peer support and teacher mentoring system program as
described in section 13015‑A. A school administrative unit without a peer support and
teacher mentoring program may not hire a conditionally certified teacher. For a conditional
certificate issued under subsection 1, paragraph A or B, the school administrative unit shall
for at least the first 2 years of employment, or longer if determined to be necessary, and,
for a conditional certificate issued under subsection 1, paragraph C, the school
administrative unit shall for at least the first year of employment, or longer if determined
to be necessary:
A. Ensure that the conditionally certified teacher or educational specialist receives
high-quality professional development that is sustained, intensive and classroom-
focused in order to have a positive and lasting impact on classroom instruction while
teaching; and
B. Provide a program of intensive supervision for the conditionally certified teacher
that consists of structured guidance and regular ongoing support or a mentoring
program, which is separate from any student-teacher requirement that may be required
under another authority.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §13012-B, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 200, §1, is
further amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
A teacher holding an emergency teacher certificate must be assigned a mentor and shall
participate in a mentoring program provided by the department or a school administrative
unit pursuant to section 13015-A. A school administrative unit without a pre-approved or
approved locally developed peer support and teacher mentoring program may not hire a
teacher holding an emergency teacher certificate. A certificate issued pursuant to this
subsection is issued for a one-year period and no more than 3 emergency teacher certificates
may be issued per applicant.
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §13015-A, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 518, §3, is amended to
read:
§13015-A. Peer support and teacher mentoring system programs
1. Purpose. The purpose of a peer support and teacher mentoring system program is
to:
A. Provide strong support services and mentoring programs that are sustained,
intensive and classroom-focused in order to have a positive and lasting effect on
classroom instruction and develop good teaching and classroom management skills for
teachers certified for less than 5 years and teachers with conditional certificates;
B. Provide assistance to and review for all individuals who are candidates for a higher
level certificate or who are teaching under a waiver of the requirement to be certified
under this chapter; and
Page 1 - 132LR0812(01)

C. Assist all teachers in becoming better teachers.
A peer support and teacher mentoring system program is separate from local practices and
procedures regarding the supervision and evaluation of a teacher for retention by a school
administrative unit. The system A peer support and teacher mentoring program established
pursuant to this section must include opportunities for all educators to share, learn and
continually improve their practices as educators in collaboration with peers. Peer support
and mentoring must be formative in nature and be for the sole purpose of ongoing
professional growth for educators.
2. Peer support and teacher mentoring programs. The department shall develop
pre-approved peer support and teacher mentoring programs to provide support and ongoing
peer engagement for new teachers and convene a group of stakeholders to aid in the
development of the programs. A peer support and teacher mentoring program must include
requirements for mentoring teachers and for each teacher mentored and may use cohort
models for mentoring. A school administrative unit shall adopt a pre-approved peer support
and teacher mentoring program developed by the department or develop its own. A peer
support and teacher mentoring program developed by a school administrative unit must be
submitted to and approved by the department.
3. Requirements. A peer support and teacher mentoring program must meet the
following requirements.
A. The peer support and teacher mentoring program must provide a stipend of at least
$5,000 per school year to mentoring teachers for each teacher mentored. The stipend
must come from the department and may be prorated if the peer support and teacher
mentoring program is less than one school year in duration.
B. The selection of mentoring teachers must be made from a list provided by or in
consultation with a local teacher's association.
C. The standards for a teacher to qualify as a mentor must, at a minimum, require a
mentoring teacher to have held a teaching certificate in the State for at least 5 years.
D. The peer support and teacher mentoring program must have a clear and actionable
plan to train mentoring teachers throughout the school year or prior to the beginning of
the school year.
E. The peer support and teacher mentoring program must have a clear and actionable
plan for mentoring teachers to provide support and regular engagement with teachers
requiring mentoring pursuant to subsection 5.
F. The peer support and teacher mentoring program must require mentoring teachers
to engage in regular professional development to improve their mentoring abilities.
4. Peer support and teacher mentoring program review. All pre-approved peer
support and teacher mentoring programs must be reviewed once every 7 years. The
department shall convene a group of relevant stakeholders including administrators,
mentoring teachers and teachers who have participated in the peer support and teacher
mentoring program as part of the 7-year review. The stakeholder group shall determine
amendments that should be made to the peer support and teacher mentoring program. A
school administrative unit shall submit its peer support and teacher mentoring program to
the department once every 7 years. A school administrative unit shall notify the department
Page 2 - 132LR0812(01)

414 if it adopts amendments to its peer support and teacher mentoring program as determined
425 by the stakeholder group.
5. Teachers requiring mentoring. The following teachers are required to have an
assigned mentor throughout the school year upon the adoption of a peer support and teacher
mentoring program:
A. A teacher holding a teaching certificate for less than 3 years;
B. A conditionally certified teacher for the duration of the conditional certification
period;
C. A teacher holding an emergency teacher certificate;
D. For the first year of employment in the new school administrative unit, a teacher
who has worked in a public school but is employed in a new school administrative unit;
and
E. A teacher who does not hold a valid teaching certificate.
6. Waiving mentoring requirement; extenuating circumstances. Under certain
circumstances, the commissioner may waive, for no more than one year, the requirement
in subsection 5 that a teacher be mentored. The commissioner may only waive the
requirement if the school administrative unit has demonstrated that the requirements of the
peer support and teacher mentoring program may result in the school administrative unit
being unable to operate.
7. Employment of certain teachers. A school administrative unit that has not adopted
and implemented a peer support and teacher mentoring program may not hire conditionally
certified teachers or teachers who hold an emergency teacher certificate. Conditionally
certified teachers and teachers holding an emergency teacher certificate must be assigned
a mentor in order to be employed at a public school.
8. Reporting. Beginning October 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, a superintendent
shall report to the department a list of every mentoring teacher, teachers being mentored
and the certification status of teachers being mentored.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.